fr: Fonctionnalité d’enregistrement: Aucun enregistrement; Enregistrement sur stockage externe; Enregistrement sur stockage interne; Décalage temporel seulement; Autre
el: Λειτουργικότητα εγγραφής: Χωρίς εγγραφή; Εγγραφή σε εξωτερικό αποθηκευτικό χώρο; Εγγραφή σε εσωτερικό αποθηκευτικό χώρο; Μόνο χρονική μετατόπιση; Άλλο
nb: Opptaksfunksjonalitet: Ingen opptak; Opptak til ekstern lagring; Opptak til intern lagring; Kun tidsforskyvning; Annet
sl-SI: Funkcionalnost snemanja: Brez snemanja; Snemanje na zunanji pomnilnik; Snemanje na notranji pomnilnik; Samo časovni premik; Drugo
pt-PT: Funcionalidade de gravação: Sem gravação; Gravação para armazenamento externo; Gravação para armazenamento interno; Apenas timeshift; Outro
th: ฟังก์ชันการบันทึก: ไม่มีการบันทึก; บันทึกลงพื้นที่จัดเก็บภายนอก; บันทึกลงพื้นที่จัดเก็บภายใน; การหยุดดูชั่วคราวเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
da: Optagefunktionalitet: Ingen optagelse; Optagelse til ekstern lagring; Optagelse til intern lagring; Kun tidsforskydning; Andet
sv: Inspelningsfunktionalitet: Ingen inspelning; Inspelning till extern lagring; Inspelning till intern lagring; Endast tidsförskjutning; Övrigt
cs: Funkce nahrávání: Bez nahrávání; Nahrávání na externí úložiště; Nahrávání na interní úložiště; Pouze časový posun; Jiné
tr: Kayıt işlevselliği: Kayıt yok; Harici depolamaya kayıt; Dahili depolamaya kayıt; Sadece zaman kaydırma; Diğer
lt-LT: Įrašymo funkcionalumas: Be įrašymo; Įrašymas į išorinę saugyklą; Įrašymas į vidinę saugyklą; Tik laiko poslinkis; Kita
pl: Funkcjonalność nagrywania: Bez nagrywania; Nagrywanie na pamięć zewnętrzną; Nagrywanie na pamięć wewnętrzną; Tylko przesunięcie czasowe; Inne
ja: 録画機能: 録画なし; 外部ストレージへの録画; 内部ストレージへの録画; タイムシフトのみ; その他
de: Aufnahmefunktionalität: Keine Aufnahme; Aufnahme auf externem Speicher; Aufnahme auf internem Speicher; Nur Timeshift; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Funcționalitate de înregistrare: Fără înregistrare; Înregistrare pe stocare externă; Înregistrare pe stocare internă; Doar timeshift; Altele
sk-SK: Funkcia nahrávania: Bez nahrávania; Nahrávanie na externé úložisko; Nahrávanie na interné úložisko; Iba časový posun; Iné
bg-BG: Функционалност за записа: Без записване; Записване на външно хранилище; Записване на вътрешно хранилище; Само времево отместване; Други
nl: Opnamefunctionaliteit: Geen opname; Opname naar externe opslag; Opname naar interne opslag; Alleen timeshift; Andere
es: Funcionalidad de grabación: Sin grabación; Grabación en almacenamiento externo; Grabación en almacenamiento interno; Solo desplazamiento temporal; Otros
pt-BR: Funcionalidade de gravação: Sem gravação; Gravação em armazenamento externo; Gravação em armazenamento interno; Apenas timeshift; Outro
zh-CN: 录制功能: 无录制功能; 录制到外部存储; 录制到内部存储; 仅时移; 其他
en: Recording functionality: No recording; Recording to external storage; Recording to internal storage; Timeshift only; Other
fi: Tallennustoiminto: Ei tallennusta; Tallennus ulkoiseen muistiin; Tallennus sisäiseen muistiin; Vain aikasiirto; Muu
it: Funzionalità di registrazione: Nessuna registrazione; Registrazione su memoria esterna; Registrazione su memoria interna; Solo timeshift; Altro
zh-TW: 錄製功能: 無錄製功能; 錄製至外部儲存; 錄製至內部儲存; 僅時光平移; 其他
hr-HR: Funkcionalnost snimanja: Bez snimanja; Snimanje na vanjsku memoriju; Snimanje na unutarnju memoriju; Samo vremenski pomak; Ostalo
ru: Функциональность записи: Без записи; Запись на внешнюю память; Запись на внутреннюю память; Только временной сдвиг; Другой
ko: 녹화 기능: 녹화 없음; 외부 저장소 녹화; 내부 저장소 녹화; 타임시프트 전용; 기타
hu: Felvételi funkció: Nincs felvétel; Felvétel külső tárolóra; Felvétel belső tárolóra; Csak időeltolás; Egyéb
vi: Chức năng ghi hình: Không ghi hình; Ghi vào bộ nhớ ngoài; Ghi vào bộ nhớ trong; Chỉ xem lại; Khác